Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 46.14.900.
Limitations.

This chapter does not

grant jurisdiction or authority with respect to air contamination existing solely within a residential dwelling or a commercial or industrial plant, workplace, or shop;

affect the relations between employers and employees with respect to or arising out of a condition of air contamination or air pollution; or

supersede or limit the applicability of a law or ordinance relating to sanitation, industrial health, or safety.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.14.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“air pollutant” has the meaning given in 42 U.S.C. 7602 (Clean Air Act, sec. 302);

“ambient air” has the meaning given in 40 C.F.R. 50.1;

“ambient air quality standard” means a standard, other than an emission standard, adopted under AS

46.14.010

,

46.14.140

,

46.14.400(f)

, or 42 U.S.C. 7409 (Clean Air Act, sec. 109);

“building, structure, facility, or installation” has the meaning given in 40 C.F.R. 51.166(b) except that it includes a vessel

that is anchored or otherwise permanently or temporarily stationed within a locale;

upon which a stationary source or stationary sources are located; not including stationary sources engaged in propulsion of the vessel; and

that is used for an industrial process, excluding a tank vessel in the trade of transporting cargo; in this subparagraph, “industrial process” means the extraction of raw material or the physical or chemical transformation of raw material in either composition or character;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of environmental conservation;

“construction” has the meaning given in 40 C.F.R. 51.166(b);

“construction permit” means a permit under AS

46.14.130(a)

, including all relevant exhibits, addendums, transmittal letters, compliance schedules, administrative orders, emergency orders, and court orders;

“department” means the Department of Environmental Conservation;

“emission” means a release of one or more air pollutants to the atmosphere;

“emission limitation” and “emission standard” have the meanings given in 40 C.F.R. 51.100;

“emissions unit” has the meaning given in 40 C.F.R. 51.166(b)(7) or 40 C.F.R. 70.2, depending on the context in which the term is used;

“federal administrator” means the administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency;

[Repealed, § 82 ch 41 SLA 2009.]

“hazardous air pollutant” means a pollutant listed in or under 42 U.S.C. 7412(b) (Clean Air Act, sec. 112(b));

“local air quality control program” means a program authorized under AS

46.14.400

to implement some or all of the provisions of this chapter;

“major modification” means a change that meets the definition of “major modification” under either 40 C.F.R. 51.165 or 40 C.F.R. 51.166;

“major stationary source” means a stationary source or physical change that meets the definition of “major stationary source” under either 40 C.F.R. 51.165 or 40 C.F.R. 51.166;

“operating permit” means a permit under AS

46.14.130(b)

, including all relevant exhibits, addendums, transmittal letters, compliance schedules, administrative orders, emergency orders, and court orders;

“operator” means a person or persons who direct, control, or supervise a stationary source or emissions unit that has the potential to emit an air pollutant to the atmosphere;

“owner” means a person or persons with a proprietary or possessory interest in a stationary source or emissions unit that has the potential to emit an air pollutant to the atmosphere;

“person” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.060

and also includes an agency of the United States, a municipality, the University of Alaska, the Alaska Railroad Corporation, and other departments, agencies, instrumentalities, units, and corporate authorities of the state;

“potential to emit” has the meaning given in 40 C.F.R. 51.166(b);

“regulated air pollutant” means an air pollutant subject to regulation under 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act);

“small business facility” means a stationary source that

is owned or operated by a person who employs 100 or fewer individuals;

is a small business concern as defined in 15 U.S.C. 632; and

emits less than 100 tons per year of regulated air pollutants;

“stack” has the meaning given in 40 C.F.R. 51.100;

“stationary source” has the meaning given in 40 C.F.R. 51.166(b) or 40 C.F.R. 70.2, depending on the context in which the term is used;

“tank vessel” means a waterborne vessel, ship, or barge, whether or not self-propelled, that is constructed or converted to carry cargo; “tank vessel” includes a tanker, tank ship, or combination carrier, but does not include a vessel that is loading or unloading

cargo in sealed drums, barrels, or other packages; or

petroleum or petroleum products solely as fuel for use on that vessel;

[Repealed, § 60 ch 3 SLA 2017.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 29 ch 23 SLA 1995; am §§ 48 — 60 ch 46 SLA 2003; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 33 SLA 2005; am §§ 81 — 83 ch 56 SLA 2005; am §§ 67, 82 ch 41 SLA 2009; am §§ 55, 60 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1995, 2003, and 2008 to alphabetize the defined terms and delete repealed paragraphs.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, repealed (13), which read “ ‘fugitive emissions’ has the meaning given in 40 C.F.R. 51.166(b);”; in (24)(B), substituted “15 U.S.C. 632” for “15 U.S.C. 631 (Small Business Act)” following “business concern as defined in”.

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (24)(C), substituted “100 tons per year” for “100 TPY”; repealed (28).